engconj.lexc
!!!engconj.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +Conj

LEXICON Root

Conjunction ;

LEXICON Conjunction

and Conj;
andor Conj;
both Conj;
but Conj;
either Conj;
nor Conj;
or Conj;
provided Conj;
seeing Conj;
to Conj;

LEXICON Conj

[stem]+Conj:0 #;
